District of Columbia statutes.
47-1810.07

Water’s-edge reporting; initiation and withdrawal election.

(a)

(1)

Absent an election under subsection (b) of this section to report based upon a worldwide unitary combined reporting basis, taxpayer members of a unitary group shall determine each of their apportioned shares of the net business income or loss of the combined group on a water’s-edge unitary combined reporting basis.

(2)

In determining tax under this chapter on a water’s-edge unitary combined reporting basis, taxpayer members shall take into account all or a portion of the income and apportionment factors of only the following members otherwise included in the combined group pursuant to § 47-1805.02a:

(A)

The entire income and apportionment factors of any member incorporated in the United States or formed under the laws of any state, the District, or any territory or possession of the United States;

(B)

The entire income and apportionment factors of any member, regardless of the place incorporated or formed, if the average of its property, payroll, and sales factors within the United States is 20% or more;

(C)

The entire income and apportionment factors of any member that is a domestic international sales corporation, as described in sections 991 through 994 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, inclusive, a foreign sales corporation, as described in sections 921 through 927 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, inclusive, or any member that is an export trade corporation, as described in sections 970 through 971 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, inclusive;

(D)

Any member not described in subparagraphs (A), (B), or (C) of this paragraph shall include its business income that is effectively connected, or treated as effectively connected under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 with the conduct of a trade or business within the United States and, for that reason, subject to federal income tax;

(E)

Any member that is a resident of a country that does not have a comprehensive income tax treaty with the United States and earns more than 20% of its income, directly or indirectly, from intangible property or service-related activities that are deductible against the business income of other members of the water’s-edge group, to the extent of that income and the apportionment factors related thereto; and

(F)

(i)

The entire income and apportionment factors of any member that is doing business in a tax haven defined as being engaged in activity sufficient for that tax haven jurisdiction to impose a tax under United States constitutional standards.

(ii)

If the member’s business activity within a tax haven is entirely outside the scope of the laws, provisions, and practices that cause the jurisdiction to meet the criteria of a tax haven, as that term is defined in § 47-1801.04(49), the activity of the member shall be treated as not having been conducted in a tax haven.

(b)

An election to report District tax based on worldwide unitary combined reporting is effective only if made on a timely filed original return for a tax year by every member of the unitary business subject to tax under this chapter.

(c)

At the discretion of the Chief Financial Officer:

(1)

A worldwide unitary combined reporting election may be disregarded, in part or in whole, and the income and apportionment factors of any member of the taxpayer’s unitary group may be included in or excluded from the combined report without regard to the provisions of this section, if any member of the unitary group fails to comply with any provision of this chapter; and

(2)

Worldwide unitary combined reporting may be mandated, in part or in whole, and the income and apportionment factors of any member of the taxpayer’s unitary group may be included in or excluded from the combined report without regard to the provisions of this section, if any member of the unitary group fails to comply with any provision of this chapter, or if a person otherwise not included in the water’s-edge combined group was availed of with a substantial objective of avoiding District income tax.

(d)

(1)

A worldwide unitary combined reporting election is binding for and applicable to the tax year it is made and all tax years thereafter for a period of 10 years. It may be withdrawn or reinstituted after withdrawal, before the expiration of the 10-year period, only upon written request for reasonable cause based on extraordinary hardship due to unforeseen changes in District tax statutes, law, or policy, and only with the written authorization of the Chief Financial Officer.

(2)

An election shall constitute consent to the reasonable production of documents and taking of depositions in accordance with District law.

(3)

If the Chief Financial Officer grants a withdrawal of election pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Chief Financial Offier [Officer] shall impose reasonable conditions necessary to prevent the evasion of tax or to clearly reflect income for the election period before or after the withdrawal.

(4)

Upon the expiration of the 10-year period, a taxpayer may withdraw from the worldwide unitary combined reporting election. Withdrawal must be made in writing within one year of the expiration of the election and is binding for a period of 10 years, subject to the same conditions as applied to the original election.

(e)

The Chief Financial Officer shall develop rules governing the impact, if any, on the scope or application of a worldwide unitary combined reporting election, including termination or deemed election, resulting from a change in the composition of the unitary group, the combined group, the taxpayer members, and any other similar change.

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 8002(d), 58 DCR 6226
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7102(d), 60 DCR 12472
Section 7101 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Combined Reporting Clarification Act of 2013”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 7102(d) and 7103 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 7102(d) and 7103 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 302(d) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-482, October 12, 2012, 59 DCR 12478), applicable for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 302(d) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-482, October 12, 2012, 59 DCR 12478), applicable for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 19-226 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 303 of D.C. Law 19-226 provided that § 302 of the act shall apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.
“(e) The Chief Financial Officer shall develop rules governing the impact, if any, on the scope or application of a worldwide unitary combined reporting election, including termination or deemed election, resulting from a change in the composition of the unitary group, the combined group, the taxpayer members, and any other similar change.”
“(4) Upon the expiration of the 10-year period, a taxpayer may withdraw from the worldwide unitary combined reporting election. Withdrawal must be made in writing within one year of the expiration of the election and is binding for a period of 10 years, subject to the same conditions as applied to the original election.
“(3) If the Chief Financial Officer grants a withdrawal of election pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, he or she shall impose reasonable conditions necessary to prevent the evasion of tax or to clearly reflect income for the election period before or after the withdrawal.
“(2) An election shall constitute consent to the reasonable production of documents and taking of depositions in accordance with District law.
“(d)(1) A worldwide unitary combined reporting election is binding for and applicable to the tax year it is made and all tax years thereafter for a period of 10 years. It may be withdrawn or reinstituted after withdrawal, before the expiration of the 10-year period, only upon written request for reasonable cause based on extraordinary hardship due to unforeseen changes in state tax statutes, law, or policy, and only with the written authorization of the Chief Financial Officer.
“(2) Worldwide unitary combined reporting may be mandated, in part or in whole, and the income and apportionment factors of any member of the taxpayer’s unitary group may be included in or excluded from the combined report without regard to the provisions of this section, if any member of the unitary group fails to comply with any provision of this chapter, or if a person otherwise not included in the water’s-edge combined group was availed of with a substantial objective of avoiding state income tax.
“(1) A worldwide unitary combined reporting election may be disregarded, in part or in whole, and the income and apportionment factors of any member of the taxpayer’s unitary group may be included in or excluded from the combined report without regard to the provisions of this section, if any member of the unitary group fails to comply with any provision of this chapter; and
“(c) At the discretion of the Chief Financial Officer:
“(b) An election to report District tax based on worldwide unitary combined reporting is effective only if made on a timely filed original return for a tax year by every member of the unitary business subject to tax under this chapter.
“(ii) If the member’s business activity within a tax haven is entirely outside the scope of the laws, provisions, and practices that cause the jurisdiction to meet the criteria of a tax haven, as that term is defined in § 47-1801.04(49), the activity of the member shall be treated as not having been conducted in a tax haven.
“(F)(i) The entire income and apportionment factors of any member that is doing business in a tax haven defined as being engaged in activity sufficient for that tax haven jurisdiction to impose a tax under United States constitutional standards.
“(E) Any member that is a resident of a country that does not have a comprehensive income tax treaty with the United States and earns more than 20% of its income, directly or indirectly, from intangible property or service-related activities that are deductible against the business income of other members of the water’s-edge group, to the extent of that income and the apportionment factors related thereto; and
“(D) Any member not described in subparagraphs (A), (B), or (C) of this paragraph shall include its business income that is effectively connected, or treated as effectively connected under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 with the conduct of a trade or business within the United States and, for that reason, subject to federal income tax;
“(C) The entire income and apportionment factors of any member that is a domestic international sales corporation, as described in sections 991 through 994 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, inclusive, a foreign sales corporation, as described in sections 921 through 927 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, inclusive, or any member that is an export trade corporation, as described in sections 970 through 971 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, inclusive;
“(B) The entire income and apportionment factors of any member, regardless of the place incorporated or formed, if the average of its property, payroll, and sales factors within the United States is 20% or more;
“(A) The entire income and apportionment factors of any member incorporated in the United States or formed under the laws of any state, the District, or any territory or possession of the United States;
“(2) In determining tax under this chapter on a water’s-edge unitary combined reporting basis, taxpayer members shall take into account all or a portion of the income and apportionment factors of only the following members otherwise included in the combined group pursuant to § 47-1805.02a:
“(a)(1) Absent an election under subsection (b) of this section to report based upon a worldwide unitary combined reporting basis, taxpayer members of a unitary group shall determine each of their apportioned shares of the net business income or loss of the combined group on a water’s-edge unitary combined reporting basis.
“§ 47-1810.07. Water’s-edge reporting; initiation and withdrawal election.
Section 302(d) of D.C. Law 19-226 amended this section to read as follows:
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 rewrote the section.
This section is referenced in § 47-1801.04 and § 47-1805.02a.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 7103 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that § 7102 of the act shall apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.

Section 8004 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided: “Sec. 8004. Applicability. This subtitle shall apply for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2010.”